dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: veure
SFX 9B Y 94
SFX 9B e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 9B ure ient/_C re
SFX 9B ure ent/_C re
SFX 9B eure ist/_v_Y re
SFX 9B eure ista/_Y re
SFX 9B eure istos/_Y re
SFX 9B eure ists/_Y re
SFX 9B eure istes/_Y re
SFX 9B ure ig/_Z re
SFX 9B re s/_Z re
SFX 9B re 0/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iem/_Z re
SFX 9B ure em/_Z re
SFX 9B ure im/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ieu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure eu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure is/_Z re
SFX 9B re en/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ia/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ies/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ia/_Z re
SFX 9B eure èiem/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éiem/_Z re
SFX 9B eure èieu/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éieu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ien/_Z re
SFX 9B eure iu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ieres/_Z re
SFX 9B ure res/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ié/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iérem/_Z re
SFX 9B eure érem/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iéreu/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éreu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ieren/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ren/_Z re
SFX 9B e é/_Z re
SFX 9B e às/_Z re
SFX 9B e à/_Z re
SFX 9B e em/_Z re
SFX 9B e eu/_Z re
SFX 9B e an/_Z re
SFX 9B e ia/_Z re
SFX 9B e ies/_Z re
SFX 9B e ia/_Z re
SFX 9B e íem/_Z re
SFX 9B e íeu/_Z re
SFX 9B e ien/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ja/_Z re
SFX 9B ure gi/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ges/_Z re
SFX 9B ure gis/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ja/_Z re
SFX 9B ure gi/_Z re
SFX 9B ure gem/_Z re
SFX 9B ure geu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure gen/_Z re
SFX 9B ure gin/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iés/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ra/_Z re
SFX 9B ure s/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iessis/_Z re
SFX 9B ure res/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ssis/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iesses/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iés/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ra/_Z re
SFX 9B ure s/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iéssim/_Z re
SFX 9B eure érem/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éssim/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iéssem/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iéssiu/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éreu/_Z re
SFX 9B eure éssiu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iésseu/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iessin/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ren/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ssin/_Z re
SFX 9B ure iessen/_Z re
SFX 9B ure ges/_C re
SFX 9B ure s/_C re
SFX 9B ure t/_C re
SFX 9B ure ja/_D re
SFX 9B ure gi/_D re
SFX 9B ure gem/_C re
SFX 9B ure g/_C re
SFX 9B ure geu/_C re
SFX 9B ure ieu/_C re
SFX 9B ure eu/_C re
SFX 9B ure is/_C re
SFX 9B ure gen/_C re
SFX 9B ure gin/_C re

# Model de conjugació: voler
SFX 9C Y 80
SFX 9C r r/_v_C_Y er
SFX 9C r nt/_C er
SFX 9C er gut/_v_Y er
SFX 9C er guda/_Y er
SFX 9C er guts/_Y er
SFX 9C er gudes/_Y er
SFX 9C oler ull/_Z er
SFX 9C er s/_Z er
SFX 9C er 0/_Z er
SFX 9C r m/_Z er
SFX 9C r u/_Z er
SFX 9C r n/_Z er
SFX 9C er ia/_Z er
SFX 9C er ies/_Z er
SFX 9C er ia/_Z er
SFX 9C er íem/_Z er
SFX 9C er íeu/_Z er
SFX 9C er ien/_Z er
SFX 9C er guí/_Z er
SFX 9C er gueres/_Z er
SFX 9C er gué/_Z er
SFX 9C er guérem/_Z er
SFX 9C er guéreu/_Z er
SFX 9C er gueren/_Z er
SFX 9C er dré/_Z er
SFX 9C er dràs/_Z er
SFX 9C er drà/_Z er
SFX 9C er drem/_Z er
SFX 9C er dreu/_Z er
SFX 9C er dran/_Z er
SFX 9C er dria/_Z er
SFX 9C er dries/_Z er
SFX 9C er dria/_Z er
SFX 9C er dríem/_Z er
SFX 9C er dríeu/_Z er
SFX 9C er drien/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulga/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ullga/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulgui/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulgues/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ullgues/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulguis/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulga/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ullga/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulgui/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulguem/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ullguem/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulgueu/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ullgueu/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulguen/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ullguen/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulguin/_Z er
SFX 9C er gués/_Z er
SFX 9C er guera/_Z er
SFX 9C er guessis/_Z er
SFX 9C er gueres/_Z er
SFX 9C er guesses/_Z er
SFX 9C er gués/_Z er
SFX 9C er guera/_Z er
SFX 9C er guéssim/_Z er
SFX 9C er guérem/_Z er
SFX 9C er guéssem/_Z er
SFX 9C er guéssiu/_Z er
SFX 9C er guéreu/_Z er
SFX 9C er guésseu/_Z er
SFX 9C er guessin/_Z er
SFX 9C er gueren/_Z er
SFX 9C er guessen/_Z er
SFX 9C oler ulgues/_C er
SFX 9C oler ullgues/_C er
SFX 9C oler ulga/_D er
SFX 9C oler ullga/_D er
SFX 9C oler ulgui/_D er
SFX 9C oler ulguem/_C er
SFX 9C oler ullguem/_C er
SFX 9C oler ulgueu/_C er
SFX 9C oler ullgueu/_C er
SFX 9C oler ulguen/_C er
SFX 9C oler ullguen/_C er
SFX 9C oler ulguin/_C er

# Model de conjugació: vore
SFX 9D Y 13
SFX 9D e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 9D e é/_Z re
SFX 9D e às/_Z re
SFX 9D e à/_Z re
SFX 9D e em/_Z re
SFX 9D e eu/_Z re
SFX 9D e an/_Z re
SFX 9D e ia/_Z re
SFX 9D e ies/_Z re
SFX 9D e ia/_Z re
SFX 9D e íem/_Z re
SFX 9D e íeu/_Z re
SFX 9D e ien/_Z re
